District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.02a

Minimum maintenance needs allowance for an institutionalize Medicaid beneficiary with a community spouse.

For purposes of protecting the income of the community spouse of a Medicaid beneficiary who is institutionalized, the Mayor is directed to set the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance at the maximum level permitted under section 1924 of the Social Security Act, approved July 1, 1988 (102 Stat. 758; 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-5 ), and to amend the District of Columbia Medicaid State Plan accordingly.

Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-70, § 2, 39 DCR 18

History